Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5050HV (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2251 Section 1. Section 456A.24, subsection 11, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 11. Establish a program governing the harvesting and sale 3 of American ginseng subject to the convention on international 4 trade in endangered species of wild fauna and flora and adopt 5 rules providing for the time and conditions for harvesting 6 the ginseng, the registration of dealers and exporters, the 7 records kept by dealers and exporters, and the certification 8 of legal taking. The time for harvesting of wild ginseng 9 shall not begin before September 1 or extend beyond November 10 1. There shall be no fees or licensing requirement for the 11 harvesting of wild ginseng beyond the applicable requirements 12 of the convention on international trade in endangered species 13 and wild fauna. A person violating this subsection or rules 14 adopted by the department pursuant to this subsection is 15 subject to a scheduled fine pursuant to section 805.8B, 16 subsection 4 . 17